src/import/nouns.lexc
@P.NomStem.First@üritus+N:@P.NomStem.First@üritus OLULINE ;
ürp+N:´ürp TAUD ;
@D.Case.Nom@ürt+N:@D.Case.Nom@´ürt TAUD ;
@R.Part.One@üsk+N:@R.Part.One@´üsK1%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
üsked+N:´üske PINGE ;
@R.Part.One@üte+N:@R.Part.One@´ütT1e PINGE ;
ütleja+N:´ütleja AASTA ;
ütlematajäetu+N:´ütlemata#j´äetu AASTA ;
ütlematajätmine+N:´ütlemata#j´ätmine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@ütlematus+N:@P.NomStem.First@´ütlematus SUULINE ;
ütlemine+N:´ütlemine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@ütlus+N:@P.NomStem.First@´ütlus SUULINE ;
üür+N:´üür TAUD ;
üüratu+N:üüratu AASTA ;
üürikorter+N:üüri#k´orter REDEL ;
üürileandja+N:üürile#´andja AASTA ;
üürileping+N:üüri#leping VIRSIK ;
üüriline+N:üüriline OLULINE ;
üüriraha+N:üüri#raha KAVA ;
üüritoake+N:üüri#t´oake PEENIKE ;
üürivõlg+N:üüri#v´õlG1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
üürivõlglane+N:üüri#v´õlglane SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@üürnik+N:@P.NomStem.First@´üürn´ik ÄMBLIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@šaakal+N:@P.NomStem.First@š´aakal REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@šabloon+N:@P.NomStem.First@šabl´oon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šabloonsus+N:@P.NomStem.First@šabl´oonsus SUULINE ;
šaboonelk+N:šab´oo#n´el,k TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šafott+N:@P.NomStem.First@šaf´ot,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šagrään+N:@P.NomStem.First@šagr´ään TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šahh+N:@P.NomStem.First@š´ahh TAUD ;
šahhimäng+N:šahhi#m´äng%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@šaht+N:@P.NomStem.First@š´aht TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šamaan+N:@P.NomStem.First@šam´aan TAUD ;
šamanism+N:šaman´ism TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šamott+N:@P.NomStem.First@šam´ot,t TAUD ;
šampanja+N:šamp`anja PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@šampinjon+N:@P.NomStem.First@šampinjon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šampoon+N:@P.NomStem.First@šamp´oon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šampus+N:@P.NomStem.First@š´ampus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@šanker+N:@P.NomStem.First@š´ankE2r REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@šansonett+N:@P.NomStem.First@šanson´et,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šanss+N:@P.NomStem.First@š´anss TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šantaaž+N:@P.NomStem.First@šant´aaž TAUD ;
šantažeerija+N:šantaž´eerija AASTA ;
šapirograaf+N:šapiro#gr´aaf TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šaraab+N:@P.NomStem.First@šar´aab TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šaraad+N:@P.NomStem.First@šar´aad TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šariaat+N:@P.NomStem.First@šari´aat TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šarlatan+N:@P.NomStem.First@šarlatan TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šarniir+N:@P.NomStem.First@šarn´iir TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šartröös+N:@P.NomStem.First@šartr´öös TAUD ;
šarž+N:š´arž TAUD ;
šassii+N:šass´ii ARMEE ;
@P.NomStem.First@šatään+N:@P.NomStem.First@šat´ään TAUD ;
šašlõkiliha+N:šašl`õki#liha KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@šašlõkk+N:@P.NomStem.First@šašl´õkk TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šedööver+N:@P.NomStem.First@šed´öövE2r REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@šeff+N:@P.NomStem.First@š´eff TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šeflus+N:@P.NomStem.First@š´eflus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@šeik+N:@P.NomStem.First@š´eik TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šelf+N:@P.NomStem.First@š´elf TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šellak+N:@P.NomStem.First@šellak REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@šenill+N:@P.NomStem.First@šen´il,l TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šerbett+N:@P.NomStem.First@šerb´et,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šerif+N:@P.NomStem.First@šerif REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@šeriif+N:@P.NomStem.First@šer´iif TAUD ;
šerri+N:šerri PERE ;
ševiot+N:ševi´ot, KABINET ;
@P.NomStem.First@ševrett+N:@P.NomStem.First@ševr´et,t TAUD ;
ševroo+N:ševr´oo ARMEE ;
@P.NomStem.First@šiffer+N:@P.NomStem.First@š´iffE2r REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@šifoon+N:@P.NomStem.First@šif´oon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šiiit+N:@P.NomStem.First@ši´iit TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šikk+N:@P.NomStem.First@š´ikk TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šilling+N:@P.NomStem.First@šilling REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@šimpans+N:@P.NomStem.First@šimp´ans TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šinjoon+N:@P.NomStem.First@šinj´oon TAUD ;
šintoism+N:šinto´ism TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šlaager+N:@P.NomStem.First@šl´aagE2r REDEL ;
šlahta+N:šlahta PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@šlahtitš+N:@P.NomStem.First@šlahtitš REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@šlakk+N:@P.NomStem.First@šl´akk TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šnitsel+N:@P.NomStem.First@šn´itsE2l REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@šnitt+N:@P.NomStem.First@šn´it,t TAUD ;
šokireklaam+N:šoki#rekl´aam TAUD ;
šokiseisund+N:šoki#seisund REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@šokk+N:@P.NomStem.First@š´okk TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šokolaad+N:@P.NomStem.First@š`okol´aad TAUD ;
šotlane+N:š´otlane SUULINE ;
šotlanna+N:š´otlanna PERE ;
šovinism+N:šovin´ism TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šovinist+N:@P.NomStem.First@šovin´ist TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@špits+N:@P.NomStem.First@šp´it,s TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šrapnell+N:@P.NomStem.First@šrapn´el,l TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šrift+N:@P.NomStem.First@šr´ift TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šuaan+N:@P.NomStem.First@šu´aan TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šugnaan+N:@P.NomStem.First@šugn´aan TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šunt+N:@P.NomStem.First@š´un,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@švaab+N:@P.NomStem.First@šv´aab TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@švamm+N:@P.NomStem.First@šv´amm TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@šveitser+N:@P.NomStem.First@šv´eitser REDEL ;
šveitslane+N:šv´eitslane SUULINE ;
šveitslanna+N:šv´eitslanna PERE ;
šõu+N:š´õu ARMEE ;
žaboo+N:žab´oo ARMEE ;
žalusii+N:žalus´ii ARMEE ;
žandarmeeria+N:žandarm´eeria AASTA ;
žanr+N:ž´anr REDEL ;
žanr+N:ž´anr TAUD ;
žanrimaal+N:ž´anri#m´aal, TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@žargoon+N:@P.NomStem.First@žarg´oon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@želatiin+N:@P.NomStem.First@ž`elat´iin TAUD ;
želee+N:žel´ee%>%{id%}%{rare%} ARMEE ;
@P.NomStem.First@ženšenn+N:@P.NomStem.First@ženš´en,n TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@žest+N:@P.NomStem.First@ž´es,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@žestikulatsioon+N:@P.NomStem.First@žestikulatsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@žetoon+N:@P.NomStem.First@žet´oon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@žgutt+N:@P.NomStem.First@žg´ut,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@žiig+N:@P.NomStem.First@ž´iig TAUD ;
žiiro+N:žiiro PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@žilett+N:@P.NomStem.First@žil´et,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@žiraff+N:@P.NomStem.First@žir´aff TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@žirant+N:@P.NomStem.First@žir´an,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@žonglöör+N:@P.NomStem.First@žongl´öör TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@žoržett+N:@P.NomStem.First@žorž´et,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@žurnaal+N:@P.NomStem.First@žurn´aal TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@žurnalist+N:@P.NomStem.First@ž`urnal´ist TAUD ;
žurnalistika+N:žurnal`is,tika AASTA ;
žürii+N:žür´ii ARMEE ;
lapselaps+N: LAPSELAPS ;
lapselapselaps+N: LAPSELAPSELAPS ;
